Utah statutes.
7-1-201.   Creation of department -- Organization.

(1)  There is created the Department of Financial Institutions that is responsible for the execution of the laws of this state relating to all financial institutions and other persons subject to this title, and relating to the businesses they conduct.

(2)  The department organization includes:

(a)  the commissioner of financial institutions, who shall be the chief executive officer of the department;

(b)  the Board of Financial Institutions;

(c)  the chief examiner;

(d)  the supervisor of banks;

(e)  the supervisor of savings and loan associations;

(f)  the supervisor of industrial banks;

(g)  the supervisor of credit unions; and

(h)  other supervisors, examiners, and personnel as may be required to carry out the duties, powers, and responsibilities of the department.



Amended by Chapter 92, 2004 General Session

